src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!!= @CODE@ saʼgdit:sagdit 131
LEXICON PROP_SAʼGDIT
+N+Prop: NMN_SAʼGDIT ;

LEXICON PROP_VIĻȚ !!= @CODE@ : 132
+N+Prop: NMN_VIĻȚ ;

!!= @CODE@ : 133
LEXICON PROP_EĻ
+N+Prop: NMN_EĻ ;
!!= @CODE@ blēʼḑ:blēḑ 134
LEXICON PROP_BLĒʼḐ
+N+Prop: NMN_BLĒʼḐ ;

LEXICON PROP_FAKT !!= @CODE@ fakt:fakt 135
+N+Prop:	NMN_FAKT	;

LEXICON PROP_FAKT-SG !!= @CODE@ fakt:fakt 135
+N+Prop:	NMN_FAKT-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_TAS !!= @CODE@ tas:tas 136
+N+Prop: NMN_TAS ;
!!= @CODE@ : 137
LEXICON PROP_NEITST
+N+Prop: NMN_NEITST ;
!!= @CODE@ : 138
LEXICON PROP_SĪEND
+N+Prop: NMN_SĪEND ;
!!= @CODE@ lǟʼnd:lǟnd 139
LEXICON PROP_LǞʼND
+N+Prop: NMN_LǞʼND ;

LEXICON PROP_ĀIGAST !!= @CODE@ : 140
+N+Prop: NMN_ĀIGAST ;

LEXICON PROP_ANALĪZ !!= @CODE@ : 141
+N+Prop: NMN_ANALĪZ ;

LEXICON PROP_NĪʼEM !!= @CODE@ nīʼem:nīʼem 142
+N+Prop:	NMN_NĪʼEM	;

LEXICON PROP_NĪʼEM-SG !!= @CODE@ nīʼem:nīʼem 142
+N+Prop:	NMN_NĪʼEM-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_JAĻKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 143
+N+Prop: NMN_JAĻKŠ ;

LEXICON PROP_VIŠ !!= @CODE@ : 144
+N+Prop: NMN_VIŠ ;

LEXICON PROP_RŪʼTŠ !!= @CODE@ rūʼtš:rūʼtš 145
+N+Prop:	NMN_RŪʼTŠ	;

!!= @CODE@ tēʼḑ:tēḑ 146
LEXICON PROP_TĒʼḐ
+N+Prop: NMN_TĒʼḐ ;
!!= @CODE@ lēʼḑ:lēḑ 147
LEXICON PROP_LĒʼḐ
+N+Prop: NMN_LĒʼḐ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 148
LEXICON PROP_KĪNTŠ
+N+Prop: NMN_KĪNTŠ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 149
LEXICON PROP_KǬŅTŠ
+N+Prop: NMN_KǬŅTŠ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 150
LEXICON PROP_LĒŅTŠ
+N+Prop: NMN_LĒŅTŠ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 151
LEXICON PROP_LĪEM
+N+Prop: NMN_LĪEM ;
!!= @CODE@ aʼm:am 152
LEXICON PROP_AʼM
+N+Prop: NMN_AʼM ;

LEXICON PROP_AZŪM !!= @CODE@ : 153
+N+Prop: NMN_AZŪM ;

LEXICON PROP_VÕȚĪM !!= @CODE@ : 154
+N+Prop: NMN_VÕȚĪM ;

!!= @CODE@ : 155
LEXICON PROP_KǬŅIM
+N+Prop: NMN_KǬŅIM ;
!!= @CODE@ : 156
LEXICON PROP_ĒTAM
+N+Prop: NMN_ĒTAM ;

LEXICON PROP_SIDĀM !!= @CODE@ : 157
+N+Prop: NMN_SIDĀM  ;

LEXICON PROP_TŪOITÕG !!= @CODE@ : 158
+N+Prop:	NMN_TŪOITÕG	;

LEXICON PROP_TŪOITÕG-SG !!= @CODE@ : 158
+N+Prop:	NMN_TŪOITÕG-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_KǬRAND !!= @CODE@ : 159
+N+Prop:	NMN_KǬRAND	;

LEXICON PROP_KǬRAND-SG !!= @CODE@ : 159
+N+Prop:	NMN_KǬRAND-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_ȬʼDÕG !!= @CODE@ ȭʼdõg:ȭʼdõg 160
+N+Prop:	NMN_ȬʼDÕG	;
!!= @CODE@ : 161
LEXICON PROP_TAPTÕD
+N+Prop: NMN_TAPTÕD ;
!!= @CODE@ tīʼedõd:tīedõd 162
LEXICON PROP_TĪʼEDÕD
+N+Prop: NMN_TĪʼEDÕD ;
!!= @CODE@ : 163
LEXICON PROP_VĪDÕZ
+N+Prop: NMN_VĪDÕZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 164
LEXICON PROP_TUOISTÕNZ
+N+Prop: NMN_TUOISTÕNZ ;
!!= @CODE@ īʼdõksmõz:īdõksmõz 165
LEXICON PROP_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ
+N+Prop: NMN_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 166
LEXICON PROP_MĪEZ
+N+Prop: NMN_MĪEZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 167
LEXICON PROP_ROʼVZ
+N+Prop: NMN_ROʼVZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 168
LEXICON PROP_KÄBRĀZ
+N+Prop: NMN_KÄBRĀZ ;

LEXICON PROP_MAIGĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 169
+N+Prop: NMN_MAIGĀZ ;

LEXICON PROP_NÕTKĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 170
+N+Prop: NMN_NÕTKĀZ ;

LEXICON PROP_RIKĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 171
+N+Prop: NMN_RIKĀZ ;

LEXICON PROP_BIKŠĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 172
+N+Prop: NMN_BIKŠĀZ ;

LEXICON PROP_ĀMBAZ !!= @CODE@ : 173
+N+Prop: NMN_ĀMBAZ ;

LEXICON PROP_PŪŖAZ !!= @CODE@ : 174
+N+Prop: NMN_PŪŖAZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 175
LEXICON PROP_PǬĻAZ
+N+Prop: NMN_PǬĻAZ ;

LEXICON PROP_RĒNAZ !!= @CODE@ : 176
+N+Prop: NMN_RĒNAZ ;

LEXICON PROP_TŌVAZ !!= @CODE@ : 177
+N+Prop: NMN_TŌVAZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 178
LEXICON PROP_PŪORAZ
+N+Prop: NMN_PŪORAZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 179
LEXICON PROP_MÕTKÕZ
+N+Prop: NMN_MÕTKÕZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 180
LEXICON PROP_VȬRÕZ
+N+Prop: NMN_VȬRÕZ ;

LEXICON PROP_ARĀGÕZ !!= @CODE@ : 181
+N+Prop: NMN_ARĀGÕZ ;

LEXICON PROP_ÄʼGGÕZ !!= @CODE@ äʼggõz:äggõz 182
+N+Prop: NMN_ÄʼGGÕZ ;
!!= @CODE@ pūʼdõz:pūdõz 183
LEXICON PROP_PŪʼDÕZ
+N+Prop: NMN_PŪʼDÕZ ;

LEXICON PROP_VĪETŠÕZ !!= @CODE@ : 184
+N+Prop: NMN_VĪETŠÕZ ;

!!= @CODE@ lǭʼtšõz:lǭtšõz 185
LEXICON PROP_LǬʼTŠÕZ
+N+Prop: NMN_LǬʼTŠÕZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 186
LEXICON PROP_SĒJI
+N+Prop: NMN_SĒJI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 187
LEXICON PROP_AKKIJI
+N+Prop: NMN_AKKIJI ;
!!= @CODE@ lēʼji:lēji 188
LEXICON PROP_LĒʼJI
+N+Prop: NMN_LĒʼJI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 189
LEXICON PROP_TUĻĻI
+N+Prop: NMN_TUĻĻI ;
!!= @CODE@ läʼbḑi:läbḑi 190
LEXICON PROP_LÄʼBḐI
+N+Prop: NMN_LÄʼBḐI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 191
LEXICON PROP_NAI
+N+Prop: NMN_NAI ;

LEXICON PROP_AʼIGI !!= @CODE@ aʼigi:aigi 192
+N+Prop: NMN_AʼIGI ;



!!= @CODE@ puʼnni:punni 193
LEXICON PROP_PUʼNNI
+N+Prop: NMN_PUʼNNI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 194
LEXICON PROP_KAȚKI
+N+Prop: NMN_KAȚKI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 195
LEXICON PROP_KUKKI
+N+Prop: NMN_KUKKI ;
!!= @CODE@ aigi:aigi 196
LEXICON PROP_AIGI
+N+Prop: NMN_AIGI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 197
LEXICON PROP_OUKI
+N+Prop: NMN_OUKI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 198
LEXICON PROP_PAŖĪ
+N+Prop: NMN_PAŖĪ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 199
LEXICON PROP_TŪĻI
+N+Prop: NMN_TŪĻI ;
!!= @CODE@ aʼbli:abli 200
LEXICON PROP_AʼBLI
+N+Prop: NMN_AʼBLI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 201
LEXICON PROP_SĒMI
+N+Prop: NMN_SĒMI ;
!!= @CODE@ lēʼmi:lēmi 202
LEXICON PROP_LĒʼMI
+N+Prop: NMN_LĒʼMI ;

LEXICON PROP_ALĪZ !!= @CODE@ : 203
+N+Prop: NMN_ALĪZ ;

LEXICON PROP_NȬŖKÕZ !!= @CODE@ : 204
+N+Prop: NMN_NȬŖKÕZ ;

LEXICON PROP_KATŪKS !!= @CODE@ : 205
+N+Prop: NMN_KATŪKS  ;

LEXICON PROP_ĀNDÕKS !!= @CODE@ : 206
+N+Prop: NMN_ĀNDÕKS ;
!!= @CODE@ : 207
LEXICON PROP_KĒRATÕKS
+N+Prop: NMN_KĒRATÕKS ;
!!= @CODE@ äʼbțõks:äbțõks 208
LEXICON PROP_ÄʼBȚÕKS
+N+Prop: NMN_ÄʼBȚÕKS ;
!!= @CODE@ : 209
LEXICON PROP_VARĪKŠ
+N+Prop: NMN_VARĪKŠ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 210
LEXICON PROP_UKŠ
+N+Prop: NMN_UKŠ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 211
LEXICON PROP_LÄPŠ
+N+Prop: NMN_LÄPŠ ;

LEXICON PROP_TUʼĻ !!= @CODE@ : 213
+N+Prop: NMN_TUʼĻ ;

LEXICON PROP_TŪĻ !!= @CODE@ : 214
+N+Prop: NMN_TŪĻ ;

LEXICON PROP_KĒĻ !!= @CODE@ : 215
+N+Prop: NMN_KĒĻ ;

LEXICON PROP_PŪOL !!= @CODE@ : 216
+N+Prop: NMN_PŪOL ;

LEXICON PROP_ĪKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 217
+N+Prop: NMN_ĪKŠ ;

LEXICON PROP_KAKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 218
+N+Prop: NMN_KAKŠ ;

LEXICON PROP_ŪŽ !!= @CODE@ : 219
+N+Prop: NMN_ŪŽ ;

LEXICON PROP_SĒŅ !!= @CODE@ : 220
+N+Prop: NMN_SĒŅ ;

LEXICON PROP_JŪŖ !!= @CODE@ : 221
+N+Prop: NMN_JŪŖ 	;

LEXICON PROP_SŪR !!= @CODE@ : 222
+N+Prop: NMN_SŪR 	;

LEXICON PROP_SĒR !!= @CODE@ : 223
+N+Prop: NMN_SĒR 	;

LEXICON PROP_BIRKOV !!= @CODE@ : 224
+N+Prop: NMN_BIRKOV 	;

LEXICON PROP_SALĀJ !!= @CODE@ : 225
+N+Prop:	NMN_SALĀJ	;

LEXICON PROP_SALĀJ-SG !!= @CODE@ : 225
+N+Prop:	NMN_SALĀJ-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_UMĀRZ !!= @CODE@ umārz:umār 226
+N+Prop:	NMN_UMĀRZ   ;

LEXICON PROP_DULLÕNZ !!= @CODE@ dullõnz:dullõn 227
+N+Prop:	NMN_UMĀRZ	;

LEXICON PROP_AʼBBÕNZ !!= @CODE@ aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228
+N+Prop:	NMN_UMĀRZ	;

LEXICON PROP_AŅGÕRZ !!= @CODE@ : aņgõrz:aņgõr 229
+N+Prop:	NMN_UMĀRZ	;

LEXICON PROP_KAʼGGÕRZ !!= @CODE@ kaʼggõrz:kaʼggõr 230
+N+Prop:	NMN_UMĀRZ	;

LEXICON PROP_PǞGIŅŽ !!= @CODE@ pǟgiņž:pǟgiņ 231
+N+Prop:	NMN_UMĀRZ	;

LEXICON PROP_VAGĀŖ !!= @CODE@ vagāŗ:vagāŗ 232
+N+Prop: NMN_VAGĀŖ 	;

LEXICON PROP_TIDĀR !!= @CODE@ tidār:tidār 233
+N+Prop:	NMN_TIDĀR	;

LEXICON PROP_TIDĀR-SG !!= @CODE@ tidār:tidār 233
+N+Prop:	NMN_TIDĀR-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_TIDĀR-PL !!= @CODE@ tidār:tidār 233
+N+Prop:	NMN_TIDĀR-PL	;

LEXICON PROP_PĒGAL !!= @CODE@ pēgal:pēgal 234
+N+Prop: NMN_PĒGAL 	;

LEXICON PROP_APPÕN !!= @CODE@ appõn:appõn 235
+N+Prop: NMN_APPÕN 	;

LEXICON PROP_ǬʼRÕN !!= @CODE@ ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236
+N+Prop: NMN_ǬʼRÕN  	;

LEXICON PROP_KĪNDÕR !!= @CODE@ kīndõr:kīndõr 237
+N+Prop: NMN_KĪNDÕR 	;

LEXICON PROP_BÄʼZMÕR !!= @CODE@ bäʼzmõr:bäzmõr 238
+N+Prop: NMN_BÄʼZMÕR 	;

LEXICON PROP_TARĪĻ !!= @CODE@ tarīļ:tarīļ 239
+N+Prop: NMN_TARĪĻ 	;

LEXICON PROP_ĀNKAŖ !!= @CODE@ ānkaŗ:ānkaŗ 240
+N+Prop: NMN_ĀNKAŖ 	;

LEXICON PROP_VIRPÕĻ !!= @CODE@ virpõļ:virpõļ 241
+N+Prop: NMN_VIRPÕĻ 	;

LEXICON PROP_ǬʼBIĻ !!= @CODE@ ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242
+N+Prop: NMN_ǬʼBIĻ	;





! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
