src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propernouns
Aʼbrig:Aʼbrig PROP_ȬʼDÕG  "Abruka" ;
Aņtš:Aņtš PROP_JAĻKŠ  "Ance" ;
Brissõl:Brissõl PROP_APPÕN  "Bryssel" ;
Dūmõl:Dūmõl PROP_APPÕN  "Dūmele" ;
Dūobõl:Dūobõl PROP_APPÕN  "Dobele" ;
Dūoņig:Dūoņig PROP_KǬRAND  "Dundaga" ;
Gipk:Gipk PROP_FAKT  "Ģipka" ;
Hapsal:Hapsal PROP_PĒGAL  "Haapsalu" ;
Irāj:Irāj PROP_SALĀJ-SG  "Mazirbe" ;
Jālgab:Jālgab PROP_ĒTAM  "Jelgava" ;
Japān:Japān PROP_TIDĀR  "Japani" ;
Kāndab:Kāndab PROP_ĒTAM  "Kandava" ;
Kuldīg:Kuldīg PROP_SIDĀM  "Kuldīga" ;
Kuoštrõg:Kuoštrõg PROP_KǬRAND-SG  "Košrags" ;
Kuresār:Kuresār PROP_APPÕN  "Kuressaare" ;
Limbaž:Limbaž PROP_JAĻKŠ  "Limbaži" ;
London:London PROP_PĒGAL  "Lontoo" ;
Lūʼž:Lūʼž PROP_RŪʼTŠ  "Lūžņa" ;
Moldov:Moldov PROP_BIRKOV  "Moldova" ;
Moskov:Moskov PROP_BIRKOV  "Moskova" ;
Nabāld:Nabāl PROP_TIDĀR-PL  "Nabaļu-suo" ;
Ōst:Ōst PROP_FAKT-SG  "Aizklāņi" ;
Parīz:Parīz PROP_ĀIGAST  "Pariisi" ;
Patskul:Patskul PROP_APPÕN  "Packule" ;
Pǟrnov:Pǟrnov PROP_BIRKOV  "Pärnu" ;
Piltõn:Piltõn PROP_APPÕN  "Piltene" ;
Pitrõg:Pitrõg PROP_KǬRAND-SG  "Pitrags" ;
Portugal:Portugal PROP_APPÕN  "Portugali" ;
Salāts:Salāts PROP_ĀIGAST  "Salaca" ;
Sǟnag:Sǟnag PROP_TŪOITÕG-SG  "Saunags" ;
Sǟr:Sǟr PROP_SŪR  "Sõrve" ;
Sīkrõg:Sīkrõg PROP_KǬRAND-SG  "Sīkrags" ;
Spāņ:Spāņ PROP_VIĻȚ  "Espanja" ;
Sūrsūo:Sūr#sūo PROP_SŪR  "Dižpurvs-suo" ;
Šlītõr:Šlītõr PROP_KĪNDÕR  "Slītere" ;
Šveits:Šveits PROP_FAKT  "Sveitsi" ;
Tallin:Tallin PROP_ĀIGAST  "Tallinna" ;
Tsirst:Tsirst PROP_FAKT  "Cirsti" ;
Ugāl:Ugāl PROP_TIDĀR  "Ugāle" ;
Ungar:Ungar PROP_TIDĀR  "Unkari" ;
Vaʼid:Vaʼid PROP_NĪʼEM-SG  "Vaide" ;
Vīḑõl:Vīḑõl PROP_APPÕN  "Vīdale" ;
Viļņ:Viļņ PROP_VIĻȚ  "Vilna" ;
Brēmen:Brēmen PROP_PĒGAL  "Bremen" ;
Pētõr:Pētõr PROP_KĪNDÕR  "Pētõr" ;
Kōrli:Kōrli PROP_SĒMI  "Kōrli" ;
Didrõk:Didrõk PROP_TŪOITÕG  "Didrõk" ;
Dantsig:Dantsig PROP_KǬRAND  "Danzig" ;
Prūš:Prūš PROP_RŪʼTŠ  "Preussi" ;
Aņdrõks:Aņdrõks PROP_ĀNDÕKS  "Aņdrõks" ;
Ans:Ans PROP_FAKT  "Ans" ;
Afganistān:Afganistān PROP_TIDĀR  "Afganistan" ;
Aļask:Aļask PROP_FAKT  "Alaska" ;
Argentīn:Argentīn PROP_ANALĪZ  "Argentiina" ;
Butān:Butān PROP_TIDĀR  "Bhutan" ;
Pētõrburg:Pētõrburg PROP_ĀIGAST  "Pietari" ;
Jēzus:Jēzus PROP_ĀIGAST  "Jeesus" ;
Kristus:Kristus PROP_ĀIGAST  "Kristus" ;
Paulus:Paulus PROP_ĀIGAST  "Paavali" ;
Mõtsāpūol:Mõtsā#pūol PROP_PŪOL  "Metsepole" ;
Ōdõz:Ōdõ PROP_PŪʼDÕZ  "Ādaži" ;
Weimar:Weimar PROP_PĒGAL  "Weimar" ;
Zürich:Zürich PROP_ĀIGAST  "Zürich" ;
Daugavpils:Daugavpils PROP_ĀIGAST  "Daugavpils" ;
